Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 41 Lead Poisoning Prevention

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, this chapter, which was designated as Chapter 40 of Title 31, was redesignated as Chapter 41 thereof, since Ga. L. 1994, p. 446 also added a Chapter 40 of Title 31.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Lead based paint hazard management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Chapter 391-3-24.